Massachusetts, session 194th, H1153.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 8G of chapter 26 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2014
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out the last paragraph and inserting in place
thereof the following paragraph: -
"Whenever a licensed appraiser, whether employed by a registered motor vehicle repair
shop, employed by a licensed insurer or acting as an independent appraiser, determines that a
motor vehicle is damaged such that (a) it may no longer meet the safety standards established by
the registrar of motor vehicles under section seven A of chapter ninety; or (b), it may no longer
comply with the motor vehicle emission standards established by the commissioner of the
department of environmental protection under section 142M of chapter one hundred and eleven,
of 2

then the appraiser shall provide notice, in a format and containing such information as shall be
prescribed by the registrar of motor vehicles, to the owner of the motor vehicle that the vehicle
no longer meets such safety or emissions standards. The notice shall direct the owner of the
motor vehicle to have the vehicle repaired so that it may pass the safety and emissions standards
and to obtain a new certificate of inspection. The registrar of motor vehicles shall periodically,
but not less frequently than annually issue specific guidelines on the safety or emissions items
that require the prescribed notice to and shall publish such guidelines in the Massachusetts
Register. The registrar of motor vehicles shall establish rules and regulations promulgated
pursuant to chapter 30A for the implementation and enforcement of this paragraph.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect on passage."
of 2